District of Columbia statutes.
8-806

Reinspection of premises.

(a)

The Mayor shall reinspect a premises for which a notice of violation has been issued and for which abatement has been required.

(b)

The reinspection shall occur within a reasonable time of the date of issuance of the notice of violation or within a reasonable time of a hearing examiner order pursuant to § 8-805(c), and the reinspection shall be for the purposes of assessing and verifying the abatement.

(c)

If the Mayor determines that the nuisance has not been abated satisfactorily, then the Mayor shall abate the nuisance and may impose the sanction provided in § 8-807(d).

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-100, § 7, 33 DCR 781
1981 Ed., § 6-2906.